Utah statutes.
4-10-5.   License -- Application -- Fees -- Expiration -- Renewal.
(1) (a)  Application for a license to manufacture, repair, or to engage in the
wholesale sale of bedding, upholstered furniture, quilted clothing, or filling
material shall be made to the department on forms prescribed and furnished by
the department.
(b)  Upon receipt of a proper application and payment of the appropriate
license fee, the commissioner, if satisfied that the convenience and necessity
of the industry and the public will be served, shall issue to the applicant a
license to engage in the particular activity through December 31 of the year
in which the license is issued, subject to suspension or revocation for cause.
(c)  A person doing business under more than one name shall be licensed for
each name under which business is conducted.
(2)  The annual license fee for each license issued under this chapter shall
be determined by the department pursuant to Subsection 4-2-2(2).
(3)  Each license issued under this chapter is renewable for a period of one
year upon the payment of the applicable amount for the particular license
sought to be renewed on or before December 31 of each year.
(4)  A person who holds a valid manufacturer's license may, upon application,
be licensed as a wholesale dealer, supplier, or repairer without the payment
of an additional license fee.
(5)  A person who fails to renew a license and engages in conduct requiring a
license under this chapter shall pay the applicable license fee for each year
in which the person engages in conduct requiring a license for which a license
is not renewed.
(6)  The department may retroactively collect a fee owed under Subsection (5).
